Wisconsin, session 2025, AB434.
do enact as follows:AB434,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB434,25Section 2. 20.395 (2) (ja) of the statutes is created to read:AB434,2,8620.395 (2) (ja) Local traffic calming grants. From the general fund, as a 7continuing appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for the local traffic calming 8grant program under s. 85.024.AB434,39Section 3. 85.024 of the statutes is created to read:AB434,2,181085.024 Local traffic calming grants. The department shall develop and 11administer a local traffic calming grant program. From the appropriation under s. 1220.395 (2) (ja), the department shall award grants to counties, cities, villages, 13towns, and federally recognized Indian tribes or bands for infrastructure projects 14that are eligible for funding under the federal transportation alternatives program 15and that are designed to reduce the speed of vehicular traffic. The department 16shall prescribe the form, nature, and extent of information that shall be contained 17in applications for grants under this section and shall establish criteria for 18evaluating applications and for awarding grants under this section.AB434,2,1919